th: ขนาดปากขวด / ขนาดฝาปิด: ปากขวดฝาจีบ 26 มม.; 28 มม. PCO (ขวดโซดา PET); ปากขวดฝาจีบ 29 มม.; เกลียว 38 มม.; ปากขวดจุกก๊อก (แชมเปญ/เบลเยียม); ปากขวดจุกก๊อก (ไวน์มาตรฐาน); ปากขวดเกลียวโกรว์เลอร์; ปากขวดฝาสวิง; อื่นๆ
de: Flaschenhalsfinish bzw. Verschlussgröße: 26 mm Kronkorken-Mündung; 28 mm PCO (PET-Limonade); 29 mm Kronkorken-Mündung; 38 mm Gewinde; Korkmündung (Champagner/Belgisch); Korkmündung (Standard-Wein); Growler-Gewindemündung; Bügelverschluss-Mündung; Sonstige
en: Bottle neck finish / closure size: 26 mm crown finish; 28 mm PCO (PET soda); 29 mm crown finish; 38 mm thread; Cork finish (champagne/belgian); Cork finish (standard wine); Growler thread finish; Swing-top finish; Other
lt-LT: Butelio kaklelio apdaila / uždarymo dydis: 26 mm vainikinis kamštelis; 28 mm PCO (PET gazuotiems gėrimams); 29 mm vainikinis kamštelis; 38 mm sriegis; Kamštinė apdaila (šampano / belgiška); Kamštinė apdaila (standartinio vyno); „Growler“ sriegio apdaila; Lankelinio kamščio apdaila; Kita
sv: Flaskhalsyta/stängningsstorlek: 26 mm kronkapsyl; 28 mm PCO (PET-läsk); 29 mm kronkapsyl; 38 mm gänga; Korkhals (champagne/belgisk); Korkhals (standardvin); Gängad growlerhals; Bygelkapsylhals; Annan
pt-PT: Acabamento/tamanho de abertura do gargalo da garrafa: Acabamento de coroa 26 mm; 28 mm PCO (refrigerantes PET); Acabamento de coroa 29 mm; Rosca 38 mm; Acabamento para rolha (champanhe/belga); Acabamento para rolha (vinho padrão); Acabamento de rosca de growler; Acabamento basculante; Outro
sl-SI: Velikost grla/vrha steklenice: 26 mm kronski pokrovček; 28 mm PCO (PET pijače); 29 mm kronski pokrovček; 38 mm navoj; Zaključek za pluto (šampanjec/belgijsko pivo); Zaključek za pluto (standardno vino); Navojni zaključek za točeno pivo (growler); Zaključek za patentni zamašek; Drugo
hu: Palacknyak felület-/nyílásmérete: 26 mm-es koronazáras; 28 mm-es PCO (PET üdítős); 29 mm-es koronazáras; 38 mm-es menetes; Parafadugós (pezsgő/belga); Parafadugós (normál boros); Growler menetes; Csatos nyak; Egyéb
el: Φινίρισμα στομίου φιάλης / μέγεθος πώματος: Λαιμός crown 26 mm; 28 mm PCO (PET αναψυκτικού); Λαιμός crown 29 mm; Σπείρωμα 38 mm; Λαιμός για φελλό (σαμπάνια/βελγική); Λαιμός για φελλό (τυπικό κρασί); Σπείρωμα για growler; Λαιμός τύπου swing-top; Άλλο
vi: Kích thước miệng chai/nắp chai: Cổ nắp vương miện 26 mm; PCO 28 mm (PET soda); Cổ nắp vương miện 29 mm; Ren 38 mm; Cổ nút bần (champagne/bia Bỉ); Cổ nút bần (rượu vang tiêu chuẩn); Cổ ren bình growler; Cổ nắp cài; Khác
nl: Fleshalsafwerking / sluitingmaat: 26 mm kroonafwerking; 28 mm PCO (PET-frisdrank); 29 mm kroonafwerking; 38 mm schroefdraad; Kurkafwerking (champagne/Belgisch); Kurkafwerking (standaard wijn); Schroefdraadafwerking growler; Beugelafwerking; Overige
it: Finitura del collo della bottiglia / chiusura taglia: Tappo a corona 26 mm; 28 mm PCO (PET soda); Tappo a corona 29 mm; Filettatura 38 mm; Finitura in sughero (champagne/belga); Finitura in sughero (vino standard); Finitura filettata per growler; Finitura con tappo meccanico; Altro
zh-TW: 瓶頸表面處理 / 瓶蓋尺寸: 26 mm 皇冠瓶口; 28 mm PCO (PET 汽水瓶); 29 mm 皇冠瓶口; 38 mm 螺紋; 軟木塞瓶口 (香檳/比利時啤酒); 軟木塞瓶口 (標準葡萄酒); 啤酒外帶瓶螺紋口; 翻蓋瓶口; 其他
fi: Pullonkaulan viimeistely / sulkimen koko: 26 mm kruunukorkki; 28 mm PCO (PET-virvoitusjuoma); 29 mm kruunukorkki; 38 mm kierre; Korkkiviimeistely (samppanja/belgialainen); Korkkiviimeistely (tavallinen viini); Growler-kierreviimeistely; Patenttikorkkiviimeistely; Muu
bg-BG: Завършек на гърлото на бутилката/размер на затварящия механизъм: 26 mm кроненкорк; 28 mm PCO (PET за газирани напитки); 29 mm кроненкорк; 38 mm резба; Гърло за корк (шампанско/белгийска бира); Гърло за корк (стандартно вино); Резба за гроулър; Гърло за суинг-топ тапа; Друго
da: Flaskehalsens udformning/lukningens størrelse: 26 mm kapsel; 28 mm PCO (PET-sodavand); 29 mm kapsel; 38 mm gevind; Korkprop (champagne/belgisk); Korkprop (standard vin); Growler-gevind; Patentprop; Andet
cs: Velikost hrdla / uzávěru lahve: 26mm korunkový uzávěr; 28mm PCO (PET láhve); 29mm korunkový uzávěr; 38mm závit; Korkový uzávěr (šampaňské/belgické); Korkový uzávěr (standardní víno); Závitový uzávěr na growler; Pákový uzávěr; Jiné
ja: ボトルネックの仕上げ／蓋のサイズ: 26 mm 王冠仕上げ; 28 mm PCO（PETソーダ）; 29 mm 王冠仕上げ; 38 mm ネジ; コルク仕上げ（シャンパン/ベルジャン）; コルク仕上げ（標準ワイン）; グラウラーネジ仕上げ; スイングトップ仕上げ; その他
hr-HR: Završna obrada grla boce / veličina zatvarača: 26 mm (krunski čep); 28 mm PCO (PET boce); 29 mm (krunski čep); 38 mm navoj; Završetak za pluto (šampanjac/belgijski); Završetak za pluto (standardno vino); Navoj za growler; Završetak sa swing-top čepom; Ostalo
ko: 병 입구 규격 / 마개 크기: 26mm 크라운 캡; 28mm PCO(PET 탄산음료); 29mm 크라운 캡; 38mm 나사산; 코르크 마감(샴페인/벨기에); 코르크 마감(표준 와인); 그라울러 나사산 마감; 스윙탑 마감; 기타
pt-BR: Acabamento/fechamento do gargalo da garrafa: Acabamento de coroa de 26 mm; 28 mm PCO (PET para refrigerante); Acabamento de coroa de 29 mm; Rosca de 38 mm; Acabamento de rolha (champanhe/belga); Acabamento de rolha (vinho padrão); Acabamento de rosca para growler; Acabamento de tampa flip-top; Outros
zh-CN: 瓶颈端盖/封口尺寸: 26 mm 皇冠盖; 28 mm PCO (PET 汽水); 29 mm 皇冠盖; 38 mm 螺纹; 软木塞封口（香槟/比利时酒）; 软木塞封口（标准葡萄酒）; 啤酒瓶螺纹封口; 机械盖封口; 其他
pl: Wykończenie szyjki butelki / rozmiar zamknięcia: Kapsel 26 mm (koronowy); 28 mm PCO (butelki PET); Kapsel 29 mm (koronowy); Gwint 38 mm; Korek (szampan / styl belgijski); Korek (standardowe wino); Gwint do growlerów; Zamknięcie pałąkowe (swing-top); Inne
fr: Finition du goulot/taille de la fermeture: Bague couronne de 26 mm; PCO de 28 mm (PET soda); Bague couronne de 29 mm; Filetage de 38 mm; Finition liège (champagne/belge); Finition liège (vin standard); Finition filetée pour cruchon; Bague mécanique; Autre
tr: Şişe boynu bitişi/kapatma ölçüsü: 26 mm taç kapak; 28 mm PCO (PET soda); 29 mm taç kapak; 38 mm dişli; Mantar kapak (şampanya/belçika); Mantar kapak (standart şarap); Fıçı şişe dişli kapak; Çemberli kapak; Diğer
ro-RO: Finisaj gât sticlă/dimensiuni închidere: Finisaj tip coroană de 26 mm; PCO de 28 mm (suc PET); Finisaj tip coroană de 29 mm; Filet de 38 mm; Finisaj cu dop de plută (șampanie/belgiană); Finisaj cu dop de plută (vin standard); Finisaj cu filet pentru growler; Finisaj swing-top; Altele
nb: Størrelse på flaskehals/lukkemekanisme: 26 mm kronefinish; 28 mm PCO (PET-brus); 29 mm kronefinish; 38 mm gjenger; Korkfinish (champagne/belgisk); Korkfinish (standard vin); Growler-gjengefinish; Patentkorkfinish; Annet
es: Acabado del cuello o tamaño del cierre de la botella: Acabado de corona de 26 mm; PCO de 28 mm (refresco en PET); Acabado de corona de 29 mm; Rosca de 38 mm; Acabado para corcho (champán/belga); Acabado para corcho (vino estándar); Acabado de rosca para growler; Acabado de cierre mecánico; Otro
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava hrdla fľaše/veľkosť uzáveru: 26 mm pre korunkový uzáver; 28 mm PCO (PET fľaša); 29 mm pre korunkový uzáver; 38 mm závit; Pre korkový uzáver (šampanské/belgické); Pre korkový uzáver (štandardné víno); Závit pre pivný džbán (growler); Pre patentný (strmeňový) uzáver; Iné
ru: Форма горлышка бутылки / размер укупорки: Кроненпробка 26 мм; 28 мм PCO (ПЭТ для газировки); Кроненпробка 29 мм; Резьба 38 мм; Под пробку (шампанское/бельгийское); Под пробку (стандартное вино); Резьба для гроулера; Под бугельную пробку; Другое